Utah statutes.
59-2-1356.   Sale -- Certificate of sale to be issued.
If any foreclosure sale is made, the sheriff shall give to the purchaser a
certificate of sale as in the case of sales upon execution, and shall file a
duplicate of the certificate with the county recorder and county auditor.
Where any property has been purchased by the county at any foreclosure sale,
the certificate of sale may be sold and assigned by it to any person upon
payment of a sum not less than the amount for which it was sold to the county,
together with interest.  The assignee acquires all the rights of the county in
the property.
